Hawaii statutes.
§431:10-222 Construction industry;
indemnity agreements invalid. Any covenant, promise, agreement or
understanding in, or in connection with or collateral to, a contract or
agreement relative to the construction, alteration, repair or maintenance of a
building, structure, appurtenance or appliance, including moving, demolition or
excavation connected therewith, purporting to indemnify the promisee against
liability for bodily injury to persons or damage to property caused by or
resulting from the sole negligence or wilful misconduct of the promisee, the
promisee's agents or employees, or indemnitee, is invalid as against public
policy, and is void and unenforceable; provided that this section shall not
affect any valid workers' compensation claim under chapter 386 or any other
insurance contract or agreement issued by an admitted insurer upon any
insurable interest under this code. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Cross References

Insurance policies issued to construction professionals, see
§431:1-217.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next